test/src/morphology/V-iiqedw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - ī’edõ: # Verb 57 'eng /est lõigata/fin' - full paradigm
     ī’edõ+V+Inf: ī’edõ
     ī’edõ+V+Ger: ī’edõs
     ī’edõ+V+Sup: ī’edõm
     ī’edõ+V+Sup+Ine: ī’edõmõs
     ī’edõ+V+Sup+Ela: ī’edõmõst
     ī’edõ+V+Sup+Tra: ī’edõmõks
     ī’edõ+V+Sup+Abe: ī’edõmõt
     ī’edõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ī’edõb
     ī’edõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ī’edõt
     ī’edõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ī’edõbõd
     ī’edõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ī’ediz
     ī’edõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ī’edizt, ī’ediztõ]
     ī’edõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ī’edizt, ī’ediztõ]
     ī’edõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ī’ed
     ī’edõ+V+Cond+Sg3: ī’edõks
     ī’edõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ī’ed
     ī’edõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ī’ed
     ī’edõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ī’edõgid
     ī’edõ+V+Jus+Sg3: ī’edõg
     ī’edõ+V+Quo+Sg3: ī’ediji
     ī’edõ+V+ActPrfPrc: ī’edõn
     ī’edõ+V+PssPrfPrc: ī’edtõd
